sv: Fisketråd - material: Fluorkol; Nylon; Polyeten (PE); Polyetentereftalat (PET); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Polyvinylidenfluorid (PVDF); Rostfritt stål; Övrigt
hr-HR: Materijal ribolovne uzice: Fluorougljik; Najlon; Polietilen (PE); Polietilen tereftalat (PET); Polivinil klorid (PVC); Poliviniliden fluorid (PVDF); Nehrđajući čelik; Ostalo
ja: 釣り糸の材質: フロロカーボン; ナイロン; ポリエチレン (PE); ポリエチレンテレフタラート (PET); ポリ塩化ビニル (PVC); ポリフッ化ビニリデン (PVDF); ステンレススチール; その他
ro-RO: Material fir de pescuit: Fluorocarbon; Nailon; Polietilenă (PE); Tereftalat de polietilenă (PET); Clorură de polivinil (PVC); Fluorură de poliviniliden (PVDF); Oțel inoxidabil; Altele
pt-BR: Material de linha de pesca: Fluorcarbono; Nylon; Polietileno (PE); Polibutileno tereftalato (PET); Cloreto de polivinila (PVC); Fluoreto de polivinilideno (PVDF); Aço inoxidável; Outro
tr: Olta teli malzemesi: Florokarbon; Plastik; Polietilen (PE); Polietilen tereftalat (PET); Polivinil klorür (PVC); Poliviniliden florür (PVDF); Paslanmaz çelik; Diğer
lt-LT: Valo medžiaga: Fluorokarbonas; Nailonas; Polietilenas (PE); Polietileno tereftalatas (PET); Polivinilchloridas (PVC); Polivinilideno floridas (PVDF); Nerūdijantysis plienas; Kita
zh-CN: 鱼线材质: 氟碳; 尼龙; 聚乙烯 (PE); 聚对苯二甲酸乙二醇酯 (PET); 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 聚偏二氟乙烯 (PVDF); 不锈钢; 其他
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำสายเบ็ดตกปลา: ฟลูออโรคาร์บอน; ไนลอน; โพลิเอทิลีน (PE); โพลิเอทิลีนเทเรฟทาเลต (PET); โพลิไวนิลคลอไรด์ (PVC); โพลิไวนิลลิดีนฟลูออไรด์ (PVDF); เหล็กสเตนเลส; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Материал за кордата: Флуоровъглерод; Найлон; Полиетилен (PE); Полиетилен терефталат (PET); Поливинилхлорид (PVC); Поливинилиден флуорид (PVDF); Неръждаема стомана; Други
fi: Kalastuslangan materiaali: Fluorihiili; Nailon; Polyeteeni (PE); Polyetyleenitereftalaatti (PET); Polyvinyylikloridi (PVC); Polyvinylideenifluoridi (PVDF); Ruostumaton teräs; Muu
sl-SI: Material ribiške žice: Fluorokarbon; Najlon; Polietilen (PE); Polietilen tereftalat (PET); Polivinilklorid (PVC); Poliviniliden fluorid (PVDF); Nerjavno jeklo; Drugo
es: Material del hilo de pesca: Fluorocarbono; Nylon; Polietileno (PE); Tereftalato de polietileno (PET); Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Fluoruro de polivinilideno (PVDF); Acero inoxidable; Otros
cs: Materiál rybářského vlasce: Fluorokarbon; Nylon; Polyethylen (PE); Polyethylentereftalát (PET); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Polyvinylidenfluorid (PVDF); Nerezová ocel; Jiné
el: Υλικό πετονιάς ψαρέματος: Φθοράνθρακας; Νάιλον; Πολυαιθυλένιο (PE); Τερεφθαλικό πολυαιθυλένιο (PETG); Πολυβινυλοχλωρίδιο (PVC); Φθοριούχο πολυβινυλιδένιο (PVDF); Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Άλλο
zh-TW: 釣魚線材質: 氟碳; 尼龍; 聚乙烯 (PE); 聚對苯二甲酸乙二酯 (PET); 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 聚偏二氟乙烯 (PVDF); 不銹鋼; 其他
hu: Horgászzsinór anyaga: Fluorkarbon; Nejlon; Polietilén (PE); Polietilén-tereftalát (PET); Polivinil-klorid (PVC); Polivinilidén-fluorid (PVDF); Rozsdamentes acél; Egyéb
fr: Matériau du fil de pêche: Fluorocarbon; Nylon; Polyéthylène (PE); Polyéthylène téréphtalate (PET); Chlorure de polyvinyle (PVC); Fluorure de polyvinylidène (PVDF); Acier inoxydable; Autre
pt-PT: Material de fio de pesca: Fluorcarbono; Náilon; Polietileno (PE); Polietileno tereftalato (PET); Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Fluoruro de polivinilideno (PVDF); Aço inoxidável; Outro
nb: Fisketrådmateriale: Fluorkarbon; Nylon; Polyetylen (PE); Polybutylen-tereftalat (PET); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Polyvinylidenfluorid (PVDF); Rustfritt stål; Annet
sk-SK: Materiál rybárskeho prútu: Fluorokarbón; Nylon; Polyetylén (PE); Polyetyléntereftalát (PET); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Polyvinylidénfluorid (PVDF); Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Iné
ko: 낚시줄 소재: 탄화불소; 나일론; 폴리에틸렌(PE); 폴리부틸렌 테레프탈레이트(PBT); 폴리염화비닐(PVC); 폴리비닐리덴 플루오라이드(PVDF); 스테인리스 스틸; 기타
it: Materiale del filo da pesca: Fluorocarbonio; Nylon; Polietilene (PE); Polietilene tereftalato (PET); Cloruro di polivinile (PVC); Fluoro di polivinilidene (PVDF); Acciaio inossidabile; Altro
da: Fisketrådsmateriale: Fluorocarbon; Nylon; Polyethylen (PE); Polyethylenterephthalat (PET); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Polyvinylidenfluorid (PVDF); Rustfrit stål; Andet
en: Fishing wire material: Fluorocarbon; Nylon; Polyethylene (PE); Polyethylene terephthalate (PET); Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Polyvinylidene fluoride (PVDF); Stainless steel; Other
ru: Материал рыболовных поводков: Фторуглерод; Нейлон; Полиэтилен (ПЭ); Полиэтилентерефталатгликоль (ПЭТГ); Поливинилхлорид (ПВХ); Поливинилиденфторид (ПВДФ); Нержавеющая сталь; Другой
vi: Vật liệu dây câu: Fluorocarbon; Nylon; Polyethylene (PE); Polyethylene terephthalate (PET); Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Polyvinylidene fluoride (PVDF); Thép không gỉ; Khác
pl: Materiał drutu wędkarskiego: Perfluorowęglowodory; Nylon; Polietylen (PE); Politereftalan etylenu (PET); Polichlorek winylu (PVC); Polifluorek winylidenu (PVDF); Stal nierdzewna; Inne
nl: Materiaal visdraad: Fluorkoolstof; Nylon; Polyethyleen (PE); Polyethyleentereftalaat (PET); Polyvinylchloride (PVC); Polyvinylideenfluoride (PVDF); Roestvrij staal; Andere
de: Angelschnurmaterial: Fluorkohlenstoff; Nylon; Polyethylen (PE); Polyethylenterephthalat (PET); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Polyvinylidenfluorid (PVDF); Edelstahl; Sonstiges